Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 13.5
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE
FOR CHILD SUPPORT
ESTABLISHMENT AND ENFORCEMENT

Section

26-13.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Administrative Procedure Act for the Establishment and Enforcement of Child Support".

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1238, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

26-13.5-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 13.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Administrative order" means an order that establishes paternity, child support, or medical support obligations or modifies the monthly support obligation or medical support provisions of an administrative process action order issued by a delegate child support enforcement unit or an administrative agency of another state or comparable jurisdiction with similar authority. The administrative order may be stipulated, temporary, or by default.

(1.1) "Administrative process action" or "APA" means an administrative action conducted to establish or modify an administrative order pursuant to this article 13.5.

(1.2) "APA-petitioner" means the party who has applied or been mandatorily referred for child support services pursuant to article 13 of this title 26.

(1.3) "APA-respondent" means the party that did not apply for child support services and was not mandatorily referred for child support services pursuant to article 13 of this title 26.

"Arrears" or "arrearages" means amounts of past-due and unpaid monthly support obligations established by court or administrative order.

"Child support debt" means an amount calculated pursuant to section 14-14-104 or by a delegate child support enforcement unit pursuant to this article 13.5 for unreimbursed public assistance provided to a family that has received or is receiving foster care placement services, aid to families with dependent children, or temporary assistance to needy families.

"Costs of collection" means attorney fees, costs for administrative staff time, service of process fees, court costs, costs of genetic tests, and costs for certified mail. Attorney fees and costs for administrative time shall only be collected in accordance with federal law and rules and regulations.

"Court" or "judge" means any court or judge in this state having jurisdiction to determine the liability of persons for the support of another person. "Court" or "judge" includes a juvenile magistrate and a district court magistrate.

(5.5) "Currently scheduled negotiation conference" means the conference date and time scheduled in the notice of financial responsibility or the date and time scheduled in the latest notice of continuance, whichever date is later.

"Custodian" means a parent, relative, legal guardian, or other person or agency having physical care of a child.

"Delegate child support enforcement unit" means the unit of a county department of human or social services or its contractual agent that is responsible for carrying out the provisions of article 13 of this title 26. The term contractual agent includes a private child support collection agency, operating as an independent contractor with a county department of human or social services, or a district attorney's office, that contracts to provide any services that the delegate child support enforcement unit is required by law to provide.

"Dependent child" means any person who is legally entitled to or the subject of a court order or administrative order for the provision of proper or necessary subsistence, education, medical care, or any other care necessary for his or her health, guidance, or well-being who is not otherwise emancipated, self-supporting, married, or a member of the armed forces of the United States.

(8.5) "District court" means any district court in this state and includes the juvenile court of the city and county of Denver and the juvenile division of the district court outside of the city and county of Denver.

"Duty of support" means a duty of support imposed by law, by order, decree, or judgment of any court, or by administrative order, whether interlocutory or final or whether incidental to an action for divorce, separation, separate maintenance, or otherwise. "Duty of support" includes the duty to pay a monthly support obligation, a child support debt, any retroactive support due, support of children in foster care, medical support, and any arrearages.

"Monthly support obligation" means the monthly amount of current child support or foster care placement costs that an obligor is ordered to pay by the court or by the delegate child support enforcement unit pursuant to this article 13.5.

(10.5) "Notice of financial responsibility" means the notice described in sections 26-13.5-103 and 26-13.5-105 for an administrative process establishment action and in section 26-13.5-112 for an administrative process modification action.

"Obligee" means any person or agency to whom a duty of support is owed.

"Obligor" means any person owing a duty of support.

"Receipt of notice" means either the date on which service of process of a notice of financial responsibility is actually accomplished or the date on the return receipt if service is by certified mail, or the date the APA-respondent signs a waiver of service of process, in accordance with section 26-13.5-104.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1238, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

L. 90:

(4) and (7) amended and (8.5) added, p. 896, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(5) amended, p. 365, § 39, effective April 9; (9) amended, p. 216, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(9) amended, p. 618, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(4) amended, p. 563, § 15, effective April 29.

L. 2003:

(7) amended, p. 1271, § 64, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(7) amended, p. 498, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2011:

(3) amended, (SB 11-123), ch. 46, p. 121, § 9, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

IP and (7) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 452, § 137, effective August 8; IP, (1), (3), (6), (8), (10), (11), (12), and (13) amended and (1.1), (1.2), (1.3), (5.5), and (10.5) added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2323, § 4, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-13.5-103. Notice of financial responsibility issued - contents.

The delegate child support enforcement unit shall issue a notice of financial responsibility to the APA-respondent who is the obligee or an obligor who owes a child support debt or who is responsible for the support of a child or to the custodian of a child who is receiving support enforcement services from the delegate child support enforcement unit pursuant to article 13 of this title 26. If the obligor has applied for child support services, the notice must be served on the obligee. The notice must advise the APA-respondent:

That the APA-respondent is required to appear on the date and at the time and location stated in the notice for a negotiation conference, or, if the negotiation conference is continued, the date and time of the currently scheduled negotiation conference to establish a child support obligation;

That, if the APA-petitioner fails to appear for the currently scheduled negotiation conference, the delegate child support enforcement unit may proceed to establish an APA order or take such other action as appropriate under the law;

That a party may contest paternity and obtain genetic testing if paternity of the child has not already been established by court or administrative order or determined pursuant to the laws of another state and a request for genetic tests will not prejudice a party in matters concerning allocation of parental responsibilities pursuant to section

14-10-124

(1.5), and that, if genetic tests are not obtained prior to the legal establishment of paternity and submitted into evidence prior to the entry of the final order establishing paternity, the genetic tests may not be allowed into evidence at a later date;

That the delegate child support enforcement unit shall issue an order of default setting forth the child support obligations if the APA-respondent:

Fails to appear for the negotiation conference as scheduled in the notice; and

Fails to reschedule a negotiation conference prior to the date and time of the currently scheduled negotiation conference; and

Fails to send the delegate child support enforcement unit a written request for a court hearing prior to the currently scheduled negotiation conference;

That, if the notice is issued for the purpose of establishing the paternity of and financial responsibility for a child, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall issue an order of default establishing paternity and setting forth the amount of the obligor's duty of support, if:

(I) The APA-respondent fails to appear for the initial negotiation conference as scheduled in the notice of financial responsibility and fails to reschedule a negotiation conference prior to the date and time stated in the notice of financial responsibility or fails to appear for the currently scheduled negotiation conference; or

(II) The APA-respondent fails to take a genetic test or fails to appear for an appointment to take a genetic test without good cause; or

(III) The results of the genetic test indicate a ninety-seven percent or greater probability that the alleged father is the father of the child, and the APA-respondent fails to appear for the currently scheduled negotiation conference;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 213, § 17, effective August 1, 1992.)

That the order of default shall be filed with the clerk of the district court in the county in which the notice of financial responsibility was issued; that, as soon as the order of default is filed, it shall have all the force, effect, and remedies of an order of the court, including, but not limited to, wage assignments issued prior to July 1, 1996, or income assignments issued thereafter or contempt of court; and that execution may be issued on the order in the same manner and with the same effect as if it were an order of the court;

That a judgment may be entered on the order of financial responsibility issued pursuant to this article, and that if a judgment is not entered on the order of financial responsibility and needs to be enforced, the judgment creditor shall file with the court a verified entry of judgment specifying the period of time that the judgment covers and the total amount of the judgment for that period and that, notwithstanding the provisions of this paragraph (e), no court order for judgment nor verified entry of judgment shall be required in order for the county and state child support enforcement units to certify past-due amounts of child support to the internal revenue service or state department of revenue for purposes of intercepting a federal or state tax refund;

The name of the custodian of the child on whose behalf support is being sought and the name and birth date of such child;

That the amount of the monthly support obligation shall be based upon the child support guidelines as set forth in section

14-10-115

, C.R.S.;

That, in calculating the amount of monthly support obligation pursuant to the child support guidelines as set forth in section

14-10-115

, C.R.S., the delegate child support enforcement unit shall set the monthly support obligation based upon reliable information concerning the parents' income, which may include wage statements or other wage information obtained from the department of labor and employment, tax records, and verified statements and other information provided by the parents and that, in the absence of any such information, the delegate child support enforcement unit may set the monthly support obligation based on the current minimum wage for a forty-hour workweek;

That the delegate child support enforcement unit may issue an administrative subpoena to obtain income information from the obligor;

That the court or delegate child support enforcement unit may enter an order directing the obligor to pay for support of the child, in an amount as may be determined by the court or delegate child support enforcement unit to be reasonable under the circumstances, for a time period prior to the entry of an order establishing paternity or for a time period prior to the entry of the support order established pursuant to section

19-6-104

, C.R.S.;

The amount of the child support debt accrued and accruing;

The amount of arrears or arrearages which have accrued under an administrative or a court order for support;

That the costs of collection, as defined in section

26-13.5-102 (4)

, may be assessed against and collected from the APA-respondent;

If applicable, that foster care maintenance may be collected against the obligor;

The interest rate on any support payments which are not made on time;

That the APA-respondent may assert the following objections in the negotiation conference and that, if such objections are not resolved, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall schedule a court hearing pursuant to section

26-13.5-105 (3)

:

That neither the APA-petitioner nor the APA-respondent is the parent of the dependent child; except that, if parentage has been previously determined by or pursuant to the law of another state, the APA-petitioner and APA-respondent are advised that any challenge to the determination of parentage must be resolved in the state where the determination of parentage was made;

That the dependent child has been adopted by a person other than the APA-respondent;

That the dependent child is emancipated; or

That there is an existing court or administrative order of support as to the monthly support obligation;

That the duty to provide medical support shall be established under this article in accordance with section 14-10-115, C.R.S.;

That an administrative order issued pursuant to this article may also be modified under this article;

That the APA-petitioner and APA-respondent are responsible for notifying the delegate child support enforcement unit of any change of address or employment within ten days of such change;

That the APA-respondent may opt out of the administrative process action and have all issues decided by a court by delivering to the delegate child support enforcement unit prior to the date and time of the currently scheduled negotiation conference a written request for a court hearing;

That, if the APA-petitioner or APA-respondent has any questions, he or she should telephone or visit the delegate child support enforcement unit;

That the APA-petitioner or APA-respondent has the right to consult an attorney and the right to be represented by an attorney at the negotiation conference; and

Such other information as set forth in rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to section

26-13.5-113

.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1239, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

L. 90:

IP(1), IP(1)(b), (1)(b)(I), (1)(b)(II), and (1)(m) amended, p. 896, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1)(c) amended, p. 257, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(b.5) added and (1)(c) and (1)(e) amended, pp. 184, 213, §§ 5, 17, effective August 1.

L. 94:

(1)(b.5) amended and (1)(i.5) added, p. 1544, § 21, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(1)(d) amended, p. 618, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(b.5)(II) and (1)(b.5)(III) amended, p. 564, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(a.5) added, p. 380, § 10, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

(1)(h) amended, p. 517, § 6, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

(1)(p) amended, p. 109, § 7, effective March 16.

L. 2011:

(1)(o)(I) amended, (SB 11-123), ch. 46, p. 121, § 10, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(a.5), (1)(b), (1)(b.5), (1)(f), (1)(l), (1)(o), (1)(r), (1)(s), and (1)(t) amended and (1)(a.3) and (1)(r.5) added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2325, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-103.5. Notice of financial responsibility amended - adding children.

In any existing case commenced under this article, if it is alleged that another child has been conceived of the parents named in the existing case and at least one of the presumptions of paternity specified in section 19-4-105, C.R.S., applies, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall issue an amended notice of financial responsibility to add the child to the case.

The amended notice of financial responsibility to add a child to an existing case shall be served in the manner set forth in section 26-13.5-104.

The amended notice of financial responsibility to add a child to an existing case shall contain all of the advisements required in an original notice of financial responsibility as set forth in section 26-13.5-103.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, in any case where there exists more than one alleged or presumed father for a child pursuant to section 19-4-105, C.R.S., a new case shall be commenced for that child to determine the child's paternity, establish child support, and address any other related issues. If it is determined that the child is the child of parents named in an existing case, the cases shall be consolidated pursuant to rule 42 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p.1350, § 9, effective January 1, 2009.

26-13.5-104. Service of notice of financial responsibility.

The delegate child support enforcement unit shall serve a notice of financial responsibility on the APA-respondent at least fourteen days prior to the date stated in the notice for the negotiation conference:

In the manner prescribed for service of process in a civil action; or

By an employee appointed by the delegate child support enforcement unit to serve such process; or

By certified mail, return receipt requested, signed by the obligor only. The receipt shall be prima facie evidence of service.

Service of process to establish paternity and financial responsibility may be made under this article by certified mail as specified in subsection (1) of this section or by any of the other methods of service specified in said subsection (1).

If process has been served pursuant to this section, additional service of process is not necessary if the case is referred to court for further action or review.

An APA-respondent may waive service by signing a waiver of service of process and thereby waives the fourteen-day notice period required by subsection (1) of this section.

Service of process on the APA-petitioner is not required. The APA-petitioner voluntarily submits himself or herself to the jurisdiction of the delegate child support enforcement unit and the court in connection with any APA case.

A copy of the notice of financial responsibility must be provided to the APA-petitioner by first-class mail, hand delivery, or electronic transmission if agreed to by the APA-petitioner, at least fourteen days prior to the date of the negotiation conference. The APA-petitioner may waive the right to this fourteen-day notice period.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1241, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

L. 90:

IP(1) amended, p. 896, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 184, § 6, effective August 1.

L. 2018:

IP(1) and (3) amended and (4), (5), and (6) added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2327, § 6, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-105. Negotiation conference - issuance of order of financial responsibility - filing of order with district court.

Every APA-respondent who has been served with a notice of financial responsibility pursuant to section

26-13.5-104

shall appear at the time and location stated in the notice for a negotiation conference or shall reschedule a negotiation conference prior to the date and time stated in the notice. The negotiation conference must be scheduled not more than thirty-five days after the date of the issuance of the notice of financial responsibility. A negotiation conference may be rescheduled by a request for a standard continuance by the APA-petitioner or APA-respondent. A standard continuance must not be more than seven days after the date of the currently scheduled negotiation conference. The negotiation conference may also be continued for good cause as defined in rules promulgated pursuant to section

26-13.5-113

. If a negotiation conference is continued, the APA-petitioner and APA-respondent must be notified of such continuance by first-class mail, hand delivery, or electronic means if agreed to by both parties. If a stipulation is agreed upon at the negotiation conference as to the obligor's duty of support, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall issue an administrative order of financial responsibility setting forth the following:

The amount of the monthly support obligation and instructions on the manner in which it shall be paid;

The amount of child support debt due and owing to the state department and instructions on the manner in which it shall be paid;

The amount of arrearages due and owing and instructions on the manner in which it shall be paid;

The names and dates of birth of the parties and of the children for whom support is being sought and the parties' residential and mailing addresses.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 1091, § 12, effective July 1, 1999.)

The order of financial responsibility has all the force, effect, and remedies of an order of the court, including, but not limited to, wage assignments issued prior to July 1, 1996, or income assignments issued thereafter or contempt of court. Execution may be issued on the order in the same manner and with the same effect as if it were an order of the court. In order to enforce a judgment based on an order issued pursuant to this article 13.5, the judgment creditor shall file with the court a verified entry of judgment specifying the period of time that the judgment covers and the total amount of the judgment for that period. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (2), a court order for judgment or verified entry of judgment is not required in order for the delegate child support enforcement units to certify past-due amounts of child support to the internal revenue service or state department of revenue for purposes of intercepting a federal or state tax refund.

If a stipulation is not agreed upon at the negotiation conference because the APA-petitioner or APA-respondent contests the issue of paternity, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall issue an order for genetic testing if paternity has not already been established by a court or administrative order or determined pursuant to the laws of another state and continue the negotiation conference to allow for the receipt of the genetic testing results. The delegate child support enforcement unit shall pay the costs of the genetic testing and may recover any testing costs from the presumed or alleged father if paternity is established. If paternity has already been established or determined, an APA temporary order must be established without conducting genetic testing.

If a stipulation is not agreed upon at the continued negotiation conference and genetic testing is required and the evidence relating to paternity does not meet the requirements set forth in section 13-25-126 (1)(g), the delegate child support enforcement unit may dismiss the action or take such other appropriate action as allowed by law.

If a stipulation is not agreed upon at the negotiation conference and paternity is not an issue, or, if paternity is an issue and either the evidence relating to paternity meets the requirements set forth in section 13-25-126 (1)(g), or parentage has been previously determined by another state, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall:

Issue temporary orders establishing current child support, arrears, foster care maintenance, medical support, and reasonable support for a time period prior to the entry of the order for support;

File the notice of financial responsibility and proof of service with the clerk of the district court in the county in which the notice of financial responsibility was issued; and

Request the court to set a hearing for the matter.

Notwithstanding any rules of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, a complaint is not required in order to initiate a court action pursuant to this subsection (3). The court shall inform the delegate child support enforcement unit of the date and location of the hearing and the court or the delegate child support enforcement unit shall send a notice to the APA-petitioner and APA-respondent informing each party of the date and location of the hearing. In order to meet federal requirements of expedited process for child support enforcement, the court shall hold a hearing and decide only the issue of child support within ninety days after receipt of notice, as defined in section 26-13.5-102 (13), or within six months after receipt of notice, as defined in section 26-13.5-102 (13), if the APA-petitioner or APA-respondent is contesting the issue of paternity. If the obligor raises issues relating to the allocation of parental responsibilities, decision-making responsibility, or parenting time and the court has jurisdiction to hear such matters, the court shall set a separate hearing for those issues after entry of the order of support. In any action, including an action for paternity, additional service beyond that originally required pursuant to section 26-13.5-104 is not required if a stipulation is not reached at the negotiation conference and the court is requested to set a hearing in the matter.

The determination of the monthly support obligation is based on the child support guidelines set forth in section 14-10-115. The delegate child support enforcement unit may issue an administrative subpoena requesting income information, including but not limited to wage statements, pay stubs, and tax records. In the absence of reliable information, which may include such information as wage statements or other wage information obtained from the department of labor and employment, tax records, and verified statements made by the obligee, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall set the amount included in the order of financial responsibility pursuant to section 14-10-115, after considering the factors set forth in section 14-10-115 (5)(b.5)(II).

If the court or delegate child support enforcement unit finds that the respondent has an obligation to support the child or children mentioned in the petition or notice, the court or delegate child support enforcement unit may enter an order directing the respondent to pay such sums for support as may be reasonable under the circumstances, taking into consideration the factors found in section 19-4-116 (6), C.R.S. The court or delegate child support enforcement unit may also enter an order directing the appropriate party to pay for support of the child, in an amount as may be determined by the court or delegate child support enforcement unit to be reasonable under the circumstances, for a time period which occurred prior to the entry of the support order established pursuant to section 19-6-104, C.R.S.

If a parent is unemployed and not incapacitated, the delegate child support enforcement unit may order such parent to pay such support in accordance with a plan approved by the delegate child support enforcement unit or to participate in work activities, as described in section 14-10-115 (5)(b)(II), C.R.S., as deemed appropriate by that delegate child support enforcement unit, as a condition of the child support order.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1242, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

L. 90:

IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 897, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 213, § 18, effective August 1.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 582, § 22, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 1565, § 20, effective September 1.

L. 94:

(5) added, p. 1544, § 22, effective May 31.

L. 96:

IP(1), (1)(e), (2), and (3) amended, p. 619, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(d) and (3) amended and (6) added, p. 1307, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3)(d) amended, p. 1415, § 83, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 99:

(1)(d), (1)(e), and (1)(f) amended, p. 1091, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(3)(b) and (3)(c) amended, p. 773, § 53, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

(6) amended, p. 109, § 8, effective March 16.

L. 2008:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1351, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(3)(c) amended, (SB 11-123), ch. 46, p. 121, § 11, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2327, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (HB 19-1215), ch. 270, p. 2555, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (3) by Senate Bill 93-25 and Senate Bill 93-154 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act, effective July 1, 1993, amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 165, Session Laws of Colorado 1993. For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

26-13.5-106. Default - issuance of order of default - filing of order with district court - rules.

If an APA-respondent fails to appear for a currently scheduled negotiation conference, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall issue an order of default in accordance with the notice of financial responsibility.

In an action to establish paternity and financial responsibility, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall issue an order of default establishing paternity and financial responsibility in accordance with the notice of financial responsibility if:

The APA-respondent fails to appear for the initial negotiation conference as scheduled in the notice of financial responsibility and fails to reschedule a negotiation conference prior to the date and time stated in the notice of financial responsibility; or

The APA-respondent fails to take a genetic test or fails to appear for an appointment to take a genetic test without good cause; or

The results of the genetic test indicate a ninety-seven percent or greater probability that the alleged father is the father of the child, and the APA-respondent fails to appear for the negotiation conference as scheduled in the notice of financial responsibility and fails to reschedule a negotiation conference prior to the date and time stated in the notice of financial responsibility.

The state board shall promulgate rules defining what constitutes good cause for failure to appear at a negotiation conference.

The court shall approve the order of default, which must include the following:

The amount of the monthly support obligation and instructions on the manner in which it must be paid;

The amount of child support debt due and owing to the state department and instructions on the manner in which it must be paid;

The amount of arrearages due and owing and instructions on the manner in which it must be paid;

The name of the child's custodian and the name, birth date, and social security number of the child for whom support is being sought;

The information required by section 14-14-111.5 (2);

In a default order establishing paternity, a statement that the obligor has been determined to be the parent of the child;

Such other information set forth in rules promulgated pursuant to section 26-13.5-113.

The order for default may direct the obligor to pay for support of the child, in an amount determined by the court or delegate child support enforcement unit to be reasonable under the circumstances, for a time period prior to the entry of the order establishing paternity.

To approve the default order, the court shall confirm that:

The default order and all other documents required to be filed with the court pursuant to this section were in fact filed with the court; and

Notice was served on the APA-respondent or a waiver of service was executed by the APA-respondent pursuant to section 26-13.5-104.

In approving a default order, the court shall not:

Recalculate the amount of any child support obligation contained in the APA order;

Schedule or conduct a court hearing; or

Require the filing of additional documents with the court.

If the court has not approved or denied approval of the default order within thirty-six days after filing with the court, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall notify the court that the deadline for approval or denial is in seven days on the forty-second day.

The court may conduct a judicial review of the order pursuant to section 26-13.5-107.

A copy of any default order issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, along with proof of service, and, in the case of a default order establishing paternity and financial responsibility pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the APA-petitioner's verified affidavit regarding paternity and the genetic test results, if any, shall be filed with the court. Before filing with the court, a supervisor, administrator, attorney, or director of a county department of human or social services shall review the order and other documents. The clerk shall stamp the date of receipt of the copy of the default order and shall assign the order a case number. The default order has all the force, effect, and remedies of an order of the court, including, but not limited to, wage assignments issued prior to July 1, 1996, or income assignments issued thereafter or contempt of court. Execution may be issued on the order in the same manner and with the same effect as if it were an order of the court. In order to enforce a judgment based on an order issued pursuant to this article 13.5, the judgment creditor shall file with the court a verified entry of judgment specifying the period of time that the judgment covers and the total amount of the judgment for that period. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (2), a court order for judgment or verified entry of judgment is not required in order for the child support enforcement units to certify past-due amounts of child support to the internal revenue service or state department of revenue for purposes of intercepting a federal or state tax refund.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1243, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

L. 90:

IP(1) and (2) amended, p. 898, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 185, § 7, effective August 1; entire section amended, p. 215, § 19, effective August 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1545, § 23, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(1)(c)(V) and (2) amended, p. 620, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(b)(II), (1)(b)(III), and (2) amended, p. 564, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2329, § 8, effective July 1, 2019.

L. 2021:

(1)(c)(V) amended, (HB 21-1220), ch. 212, p. 1130, § 9, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by House bill 92-1214 and House Bill 92-1232 were harmonized.

26-13.5-107. Orders - duration - effect of court determinations.

A copy of any order of financial responsibility or of any default order or of any temporary order of financial responsibility issued by the delegate child support enforcement unit must be sent by such unit by first-class mail to the APA-petitioner and APA-respondent or his or her attorney of record and to the custodian of the child.

Any order of financial responsibility, any default order, and any temporary order of financial responsibility must continue until modified by administrative or court order, even if the child is no longer receiving benefits under the programs listed in section 26-13-102.5 (2)(a), unless the child is emancipated or is otherwise no longer entitled to support. In the event that the order of financial responsibility, default order, or temporary order of financial responsibility is entered in a case at a time when there is a court action on the same case, the court may credit a portion of a monthly amount paid under the administrative process order towards future payments due in the court case only if the order in the court case is established at a lower amount than the administrative process order and only to the extent of the difference between the amount of the court order and the amount of the administrative process order.

Nothing contained in this article 13.5 deprives a court of competent jurisdiction from determining the duty of support of an obligor against whom an administrative order is issued pursuant to this article 13.5. Such a determination by the court supersedes the administrative order as to support payments due subsequent to the entry of the order by the court but does not affect any arrearage which may have accrued under the administrative order.

Any party to an APA order may file a request for relief from an APA judgment or order. The request must be in writing and filed with the court after the APA order becomes effective. The court may not conduct a review of a pending APA order. The review must be pursuant to C.R.C.P. 60.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1244, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

L. 92:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 217, § 20, effective August 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 317, § 15, effective April 15.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2331, § 9, effective July 1, 2019.

26-13.5-108. Request for court hearing. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1244, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.

L. 90:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 898, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 258, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 217, § 21, effective August 1.

26-13.5-109. Notice of financial responsibility - issued in which county.

A notice of financial responsibility may be issued by a delegate child support enforcement unit pursuant to this article in any county where public assistance was paid, the county where the obligor resides, the county where the obligee resides, or the county where the child resides as prescribed by rule and regulation pursuant to section 26-13.5-113.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1245, § 1, effective April 1, 1990.